Massachusetts, session 194th, H1842.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of chapter 211B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the fifth paragraph the following paragraph: -

"Justices serving as a first justice and justices serving as a regional administrative justice,
which titles shall not be deemed a judicial office as comprehended under the provisions of
Article 1 of Chapter 111 of Part the Second of the Constitution, shall annually receive from the
Commonwealth, in addition to the salary hereinbefore provided, an amount of $2,500."
of 1